West Virginia, session 2026, SB404.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 2. commissioner of human services; powers, duties and responsibilities generally. §9-2-6b. Secretary to contract and collaborate with providers of child welfare services. (a) In addition to the authority in §5F-2-2 and §9-2-6 of this code, the secretary is authorized to contract and collaborate with providers of child welfare services to facilitate the provisions of services required under §49-1-101 et seq. of this code. Both secular and faith-based organizations may be considered appropriate providers of child welfare services.(b) A faith-based organization may serve as a contractor in the delivery of services under any program, on the same basis as any other nongovernmental provider, without impairing the religious character of the faith-based organization. A faith-based organization which has entered into a contract with the department shall retain its independence from state and local governments with regard to control over the definition, development, practice, and expression of its religious beliefs. The department may not require a faith-based organization to alter its form of internal governance or remove religious art, icons, scripture, or other symbols in order to be eligible to contract as a provider. When the department enters into a contract with a faith-based organization, it does so upon the understanding that the organization will maintain its nonsecular identity, without interference from the state.(c) If the legal parent or guardian of a child objects to the placement of a child at a faith-based organization, on the grounds of religious expression, then the department shall find an alternative placement for the child, as soon as reasonably able, so long as the change in placement does not violate a court order. If either the child or another legal parent or guardian want the child to remain in placement at a faith-based organization, then the matter shall be set for hearing.